Maine, session 132, LD2140.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5219-CCC is enacted to read:
§5219-CCC. Energy-efficient home improvement tax credit
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Air sealing materials" means materials used to create barriers against drafts and
prevent or reduce the loss of heat from a building and includes, but is not limited to,
caulk, weather stripping, sealant foam and tape.
B. "Building envelope improvement" means an improvement to a permanent residence
as follows:
(1) The repair of an exterior door or an exterior window or skylight or the
replacement of an exterior door or an exterior window or skylight with an
energy-efficient door, window or skylight; and
(2) The use of insulation and air sealing materials.
C. "Home energy audit" means an inspection of a permanent residence to determine
the most significant and cost-effective energy efficiency improvements conducted by
a qualified home energy auditor or under the supervision of a qualified home energy
auditor.
D. "Permanent residence" means a place in this State where an individual has a true,
fixed and permanent home and principal establishment to which the individual,
whenever absent, has the intention of returning. An individual may have only one
permanent residence at a time and, once a permanent residence is established, that
residence is presumed to continue until circumstances indicate otherwise.
E. "Qualified energy-efficient improvement" means a home energy audit or building
envelope improvement that is conducted or first placed in service during the taxable
year.
F. "Qualified expense" means an expense made for a qualified energy-efficient
improvement made to a taxpayer's permanent residence.
G. "Qualified home energy auditor" means an individual who is certified by the United
States Department of Energy to conduct energy-efficient home energy audits.
2. Credit allowed. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a resident
individual is allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due under this Part for qualified
expenses incurred for a qualified energy-efficient improvement. The amount of the credit
is determined as follows.
A. For a home energy audit, the maximum credit allowed under this section is $150.
In order to qualify for the credit, the qualified home energy auditor shall conduct a
home energy audit that is consistent with industry standards and provide a written
report that includes, at a minimum:
(1) The results of the home energy audit identifying the most significant and cost-
effective energy-efficient improvements for the permanent residence and an
Page 1 - 132LR2931(01)

411 estimate of the energy and cost savings that would be attained with respect to those
422 improvements;
(2) The qualified home energy auditor's name and relevant employer identification
number or, if the qualified home energy auditor does not have an employer
identification number, another type of appropriate taxpayer identification number;
and
(3) An attestation that the qualified home energy auditor is certified to conduct
home energy audits by a qualified certification program and the name of that
qualified certification program.
B. For building envelope improvements, the maximum credit is:
(1) For an exterior door, $250 per door and $500 total and for an exterior window
or skylight, $600 total.
An exterior door or exterior window or skylight must meet or exceed applicable
United States Environmental Protection Agency and United States Department of
Energy Energy Star program standards or similar energy efficiency standards
established or approved by the Efficiency Maine Trust; and
(2) For insulation and air sealing materials, $1,200.
The insulation and air sealing material must meet or exceed International Energy
Conservation Code standards in effect as of the beginning of the calendar year that
is 2 years prior to the calendar year in which the materials are placed in service.
The cost of the labor to install a building envelope improvement is not eligible for the
credit under this section.
3. Refundability. The credit allowed under this section is refundable.
4. Phase-out. The amount of the credit allowed by this section must be reduced, but
not below zero, by $20 for each $500 or fraction thereof by which the taxpayer's Maine
adjusted gross income exceeds:
A. For individuals filing as single individuals, $100,000;
B. For an individual filing as a head of household, $125,000;
C. For individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses, $150,000; and
D. For a married individual filing a separate return, 1/2 of the applicable amount under
paragraph C.